Illinois, session 104th, HB3781.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sprayed Fire-Resistant Material Applicator 5Act is amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (425 ILCS 75/15)7    Sec. 15. Rules and fees.8    (a) By July 1, 2025, the Office shall adopt rules 9consistent with the provisions of this Act for the 10administration and enforcement of this Act. The Office may 11prescribe forms to be issued in connection with the 12administration and enforcement of this Act.13    (b) The Office may, by rule, establish fees, including, 14but not limited to, registration fees and processing fees. No 15fee established under this subsection (b) shall exceed $25. 16All fees collected pursuant to this Act shall be deposited 17into the Fire Prevention Fund. All fees paid pursuant to this 18Act are nonrefundable. This shall not preclude the Office from 19refunding accidental overpayment of fees.20(Source: P.A. 103-377, eff. 7-28-23.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect on July 221, 2025.